District of Columbia statutes.
7-1933

Rand Corporation Assessment Advisory Committee.

(a)

There is established an advisory committee to provide oversight and review of the assessment and analysis described in § 7-1932(b)(7). The advisory committee shall consist of 5 members, 2 of whom shall be appointed by the Mayor and 3 of whom shall be appointed by the Council.

(b)

The advisory committee shall meet at a regular time and place to be determined by the committee. The advisory committee shall dissolve when its oversight and review role is complete.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-288, § 103, 54 DCR 976
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 167(b), 56 DCR 1117
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in subsec. (a).
Because of the enactment of subchapter II of Chapter 36 of Title 6 subchapter II of Chapter 20 of Title 7, 2001 Ed. by D.C. Law 12-215, the preexisting text §§ 7-2001 to 7-2008, 2001 Ed. has been designated as subchapter I.